Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-202.24
Disabled veteran or blind veteran; mobile home exempt.

A mobile home shall be exempt from taxation if it is owned and occupied by a disabled veteran or blind veteran of the United States Armed Forces whose disability or blindness is recognized by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as service connected and who was discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions).

Laws 1971, LB 990, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 273, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 2, § 16;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 162;

Laws 1997, LB 271, § 46;

Laws 2005, LB 54, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 12.